Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.790

State student financial aid program—Eligibility of certain residents attending college or university in states with reciprocity agreements.

Washington residents attending any nonprofit college or university in another state which has a reciprocity agreement with the state of Washington shall be eligible for the student financial aid program outlined in chapter 28B.92 RCW if:

(1) They qualify as a student who demonstrates financial need as defined under RCW 28B.92.030; and

(2) The institution attended is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the student achievement council for the purposes of this section and is specifically encompassed within or directly affected by such reciprocity agreement and agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations pertaining to such students and institutions adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.

[ 2019 c 406 s 25; 2012 c 229 s 518; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 139; 2004 c 275 s 44; 1985 c 370 s 54; 1980 c 13 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—1980 c 13: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 13 s 3.]